Hawaii statutes.
§490:3-408 Drawee not liable on unaccepted
draft. A check or other draft does not of itself operate as an assignment
of funds in the hands of the drawee available for its payment, and the drawee
is not liable on the instrument until the drawee accepts it. [L 1991, c 118, pt
of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next